Hawaii statutes.
§431:9A-126 Power to fine. (a) The
order levying the fine through section 431:9A-112 shall specify the period
within which the fine shall be fully paid, and that period shall be not less
than thirty nor more than forty-five days from the date of the order.

(b) Upon the licensee's failure to pay any
fine when due, the commissioner shall revoke the license of the licensee if not
already revoked, and the fine may be recovered in a civil action brought on
behalf of the commissioner by the attorney general.

(c) Any fine collected shall be paid by the
commissioner to the director of finance for the account of the compliance
resolution fund. [L 2001, c 216, pt of §2; am L 2003, c 212, §67]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next